District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.08

Maps and regulations of Zoning Commission to be filed; regulations to be published.

A copy of any map established by said Zoning Commission and of its zoning regulations shall be filed in the Office of the Mayor of the District of Columbia. A copy of any regulation or any amendment adopted after June 20, 1938, shall be published once in 1 or more daily newspapers printed in the District of Columbia for the information of all concerned.

History

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 800, ch. 534, § 9

Cross References

Rules and regulations, publication, see § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-425.
1973 Ed., § 5-421.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.